Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2802
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Security Instrument Satisfaction Act:

(1) Closing agent means a licensed title insurance agent as defined in section 44-19,108 designated by a title insurer to execute and file certificates of satisfaction pursuant to a designation of authority or a member in good standing of the Nebraska State Bar Association;

(2) Designation of authority means the designation of a title insurance agent by a title insurer, executed and acknowledged as required by law, stating (a) the name of the title insurer, (b) the name of the title insurance agent, (c) that the title insurance agent has authority to execute and record certificates of satisfaction on behalf of the title insurer, and (d) that the title insurance agent has consented to and accepts the terms of the designation;

(3) Good faith means honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair dealing;

(4) Landowner means a person that owns the real property described in a security instrument;

(5)(a) Notification or notice means:

(i) Depositing the notice in the mail or any commercially reasonable delivery service, properly addressed with postage or cost of delivery provided for;

(ii) Transmitting the notice by facsimile transmission or electronic mail to an address identified by the recipient, but only if the recipient agreed to receive notification in this manner; or

(iii) Otherwise causing the notice to be received within the time it would have been received if notification had been given by mail or commercial delivery service.

(b) Notification given under subdivision (5)(a) of this section is effective:

(i) Three days following the date that the notice is deposited in the mail or with a commercially reasonable delivery service for delivery other than by overnight delivery;

(ii) One day following the date the notice is deposited with a commercially reasonable delivery service for overnight delivery;

(iii) On the date that the secured creditor or closing agent submits electronic verification of receipt of the notice, if transmitted under subdivision (5)(a)(ii) of this section; or

(iv) On the date the notice is received, if transmitted by any other method permitted by the Nebraska Security Instrument Satisfaction Act;

(6) Payoff amount means the sum necessary to satisfy a secured obligation;

(7) Payoff statement means a statement of the amount of unpaid balance of the secured obligation containing (a) the date on which it was prepared and the payoff amount as of that date, including the amount by type of each fee, charge, or other sum included within the payoff amount, (b) the information reasonably necessary to calculate the payoff amount as of the requested payoff date, including the per diem interest, (c) the payment cutoff time, if any, (d) the address or place where payment must be made, and (e) any limitation as to the authorized method of payment;

(8) Person means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation or government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;

(9) Purchase means taking by sale, mortgage, lien, security interest, gift, or any other voluntary transaction creating an interest in real property;

(10) Purchaser means a person who takes by purchase;

(11) Record means to submit a document complying with applicable legal standards with required fees and taxes paid to the appropriate government office pursuant to Nebraska law;

(12) Residential real property means real property located in this state which is used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes and is improved by one to four dwelling units;

(13) Secured creditor means a person that holds or is the beneficiary of a security interest or that is authorized both to receive payments on behalf of a person that holds a security interest and to record a satisfaction of the security instrument upon receiving full payment or performance of the secured obligation. The term does not include a trustee under a security instrument;

(14) Secured obligation means an obligation the payment or performance of which is secured by a security interest;

(15) Security instrument means an agreement, whether denominated a mortgage, deed of trust, trust deed, or otherwise, that creates or provides for a security interest. Such an agreement is a security instrument even if it also creates or provides for a lien upon personal property;

(16) Security interest means an interest in residential real property created by a security instrument; and

(17) Title insurer means a person authorized and licensed to transact the business of insuring titles to interests in real property in this state.

Laws 2008, LB386, § 2.
July 18, 2008